Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-603
Certificate of authority; fee; issuance; effect.

The Secretary of State shall issue a certificate to every company, association, or corporation that has filed the statement required by section 86-602 and has paid a filing fee of five dollars. The certificate conveys authority to such company, association, or corporation to conduct its business within this state under sections 86-607 to 86-610.

Laws 1883, c. 80, § 3, p. 322;

R.S.1913, § 7397;

C.S.1922, § 7072;

C.S.1929, § 86-103;

R.S.1943, § 86-103;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-103;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 365.